Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5339YC (3) 91 ak/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 139A.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 19A. âPublic health agencyâ means the same 3 as defined in section 135D.2. 4 Sec. 2. Section 139A.8, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 5 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6 c. Information regarding exemptions and the requirements 7 for an exemption under this subsection shall be included in any 8 public communication following the by the department relating 9 to a recommendation of an immunization by the department 10 issued pursuant to subsection 2 , shall be included and in any 11 communication regarding immunizations to a parent or legal 12 guardian from a school, and immunization requirements under 13 this section prepared or disseminated by a school or public 14 health agency. The information shall be published on the as 15 follows: 16 (1) On the internet sites of and included in all elementary 17 schools, secondary schools, licensed child care centers, and 18 public health agencies. 19 (2) In registration documentation for all elementary 20 schools, secondary schools, and licensed child care centers. 21